dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- लंगडो; लंगडो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लंगडो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठीक; ठीक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठीक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सानोतिनो; सान; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सान/ोतिनो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोतिनो</l>
          <r>ोतिनो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ातिना</l>
          <r>ोतिनो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पुड्को; पुड्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पुड्क/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वलियो; वलियो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वलियो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फुस्रा; फुस्रा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फुस्रा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भुङ्ग्रो; भुङ्ग्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भुङ्ग्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नमीठो; नमीठो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नमीठो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खोटो; खोट; 2 -->
    <pardef n="खोट/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सजिलो; सजिल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सजिल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रत्येक; प्रत्येक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रत्येक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तल्लो; तल्ल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="तल्ल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फिलिङ्गो; फिलिङ्गो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फिलिङ्गो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गहकिलो; गहकिल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गहकिल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सामान्य; सामान्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सामान्य__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अप्ठयारो; अप्ठ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अप्ठ/यारो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेरा</l>
          <r>यारो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सफल; सफल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सफल__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाटुलो; बाटुल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाटुल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हरेक; हरेक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हरेक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्तरास्ट्रिय; अन्तर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्तर/ास्ट्रिय__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्राष्ट्रिय</l>
          <r>ास्ट्रिय<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बहिरो; बहिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बहिर/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहेलो; पहेलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहेलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बढुवा; बढुवा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बढुवा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मुक्त; मुक्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मुक्त__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आम; आम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आम__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गार्हो; गार्हो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गार्हो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- डर; डर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="डर__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निर्धो; निर्धो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निर्धो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सय; सय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सय__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कैलो; कैलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कैलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घोप्टो; घोप्टो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घोप्टो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उज्यालो; उज्याल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="उज्याल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दुवै; दुवै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दुवै__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नकच्चीरी; नकच्चीरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नकच्चीरी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नरमाइलो; नरमाइलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नरमाइलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हँसिलो; हँसिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हँसिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछिल्लो; पछिल्ल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="पछिल्ल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नांगो; नांग; 2 -->
    <pardef n="नांग/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चूलो; चूलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चूलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साह्रो; साह्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साह्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="लंगडो"><i>लंगडो</i><par n="लंगडो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठीक"><i>ठीक</i><par n="ठीक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सानोतिनो"><i>सान</i><par n="सान/ोतिनो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुड्को"><i>पुड्क</i><par n="पुड्क/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वलियो"><i>वलियो</i><par n="वलियो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फुस्रा"><i>फुस्रा</i><par n="फुस्रा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भुङ्ग्रो"><i>भुङ्ग्रो</i><par n="भुङ्ग्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नमीठो"><i>नमीठो</i><par n="नमीठो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खोटो"><i>खोट</i><par n="खोट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सजिलो"><i>सजिल</i><par n="सजिल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रत्येक"><i>प्रत्येक</i><par n="प्रत्येक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तल्लो"><i>तल्ल</i><par n="तल्ल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फिलिङ्गो"><i>फिलिङ्गो</i><par n="फिलिङ्गो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गहकिलो"><i>गहकिल</i><par n="गहकिल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सामान्य"><i>सामान्य</i><par n="सामान्य__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अप्ठयारो"><i>अप्ठ</i><par n="अप्ठ/यारो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सफल"><i>सफल</i><par n="सफल__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाटुलो"><i>बाटुल</i><par n="बाटुल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हरेक"><i>हरेक</i><par n="हरेक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्तरास्ट्रिय"><i>अन्तर</i><par n="अन्तर/ास्ट्रिय__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बहिरो"><i>बहिर</i><par n="बहिर/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पहेलो"><i>पहेलो</i><par n="पहेलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बढुवा"><i>बढुवा</i><par n="बढुवा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मुक्त"><i>मुक्त</i><par n="मुक्त__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आम"><i>आम</i><par n="आम__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गार्हो"><i>गार्हो</i><par n="गार्हो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="डर"><i>डर</i><par n="डर__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निर्धो"><i>निर्धो</i><par n="निर्धो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सय"><i>सय</i><par n="सय__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कैलो"><i>कैलो</i><par n="कैलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="घोप्टो"><i>घोप्टो</i><par n="घोप्टो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उज्यालो"><i>उज्याल</i><par n="उज्याल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दुवै"><i>दुवै</i><par n="दुवै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नकच्चीरी"><i>नकच्चीरी</i><par n="नकच्चीरी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नरमाइलो"><i>नरमाइलो</i><par n="नरमाइलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हँसिलो"><i>हँसिलो</i><par n="हँसिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पछिल्लो"><i>पछिल्ल</i><par n="पछिल्ल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नांगो"><i>नांग</i><par n="नांग/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चूलो"><i>चूलो</i><par n="चूलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साह्रो"><i>साह्रो</i><par n="साह्रो__adj"/></e>
